src/conjunction-smenob-lex.txt
LEXICON Conjunction

ahte:at Cc ;
ja:og  Cc ;
ja/dahje:ja/eller Cc ;
dahe:eller Cc ;
dahje:eller Cc ;
dahjege:eller Cc ;
dahege:eller Cc ;
dehe:eller Cc ;
dehege:eller Cc ;
ele:eller Cc ;
elege:eller Cc ;
ele% ge:eller Cc ;
muhto:men Cc ;
vai:eller Cc ;

LEXICON Cc

 +CC # ;
